Massachusetts, session 194th, H3185.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition of the General
Laws of Massachusetts, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following new
section:
"Section 65. (a) For the purposes of this section, “abortion services” shall include
performing, referring for abortion, or counseling for abortion.
(b) Taxpayers shall have the option to indicate on their income tax return that they do not
want any portion of their income tax liability to be utilized for abortion services. When a
taxpayer makes such election, the taxpayer’s income tax liability may not be used to pay for
abortion services.
of 2

(c) The portion of the taxpayer’s income tax liability that is not to be used to pay for
abortion services, pursuant to this section, must be deposited into a special account, separate and
apart from the General Fund, whose purpose shall be to develop and implement a public
information program to inform the general public of the provisions of section 39-½ of Chapter
119, concerning voluntary abandonment of a newborn infant, also known as the Baby Safe
Haven Law.
(d) The amount of the taxpayer’s income tax liability to be set aside in the special account
specified in paragraph (c) shall be determined by multiplying the taxpayer’s income tax liability
by the percentage of the General Fund dedicated to paying for abortion services in the previous
year."
of 2